Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Subchapter 6A. Humanities Council

§ 126.
Purpose of the Council.

In order to increase the opportunities of Vermonters and visitors to Vermont to take part in and enjoy programs in the humanities, a group of people devoted to history, philosophy, languages, linguistics, literature, archeology, jurisprudence, ethics, comparative religion, the theory and criticism of the arts, and related fields has formed the Vermont Humanities Council, a nonprofit organization for the purpose of assisting and encouraging libraries, schools, museums, colleges, universities, and other organizations in their several cultural and educational activities in the humanities.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 105

; amended

2003, No. 66

, § 250.

§ 127.
Designation.

The Vermont Humanities Council is designated as the nonprofit organization in the State to apply for funds distributed by the Division of State Programs, or its successor programs, of the National Endowment for the Humanities under the National Foundation of the Arts and Humanities Act of 1965, as amended.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 105

; amended

2003, No. 66

, § 250; amended

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 51.

§ 128.
Repealed. 2009, No. 33, § 83(g)(1).